Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1919.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 135. Student-related Injury Leave.-- (a) When a public school employe is rendered unable to perform his or her duties of employment by reason of injury inflicted by a student, or by a student's parent or guardian, in the course of public school employment IF THE INJURY OCCURRED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYE'S DUTIES AUTHORIZED BY PUBLIC SCHOOL POLICY , the governing body of the public school shall grant the <--<--123456789101112131415161718 public school employe student-related injury leave, under which the following shall apply:(1) For a period beginning on the first date on which the public school employe is unable to perform the employe's duties and continuing until the public school employe resumes performance of the employe's duties or until the date that is one year following the employe's injury, whichever is earlier, the public school shall pay the public school employe the employe's full salary and maintain the employe's benefits in the manner provided for under the agreement or employment contract applicable to the employe. During the period of student-related injury leave under this section, the public school employe shall be considered to be in daily attendance in the position from which the student-related injury leave was taken for purposes of the employe's length of service, right to receive increments and any other status, rights or benefits afforded by Article XI or an applicable agreement or employment contract.(2) (i) Within fifteen (15) days of the beginning of an employe's student-related injury leave under this section, the employe shall provide the public school with documentation from the employe's licensed medical provider stating:(A) the reason the employe is unable to perform his or her duties; and(B) the length of time the employe's condition is expected to continue.(ii) The period of leave may be extended up to the date that is one year following the date of the employe's injury if the employe provides updated documentation from a licensed medical provider.(3) An employe to which this section applies shall continue 20250HB1919PN3483 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to accrue sick leave and other paid leave that the employe may be entitled to accrue under the agreement or employment contract applicable to the employe and shall not be required to apply any accumulated sick leave or other paid leave to the period of student-related injury leave.(4) (i) For purposes of the Public School Employees' Retirement Code under 24 Pa.C.S. Pt. IV (relating to retirement for school employees), a public school employe shall receive full credit for the duration of the leave period if the employe is:(A) a member of the system; and(B) provided student-related injury leave under subsection (a)(1).(ii) Student-related injury leave provided under subsection (a)(1) shall be treated as an approved leave of absence under 24 Pa.C.S. § 8302(b) (relating to credited school service), except that 24 Pa.C.S. § 8302(b)(1) shall not apply.(5) (i) Any amounts received or collected during a period of leave granted under paragraph (1) by the public school employe under the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the "Workers' Compensation Act," shall be turned over to the public school.(ii) If the public school employe does not turn over the amounts as required under subparagraph (i), the amounts shall be deducted from any salary then or thereafter due to the public school employe.(iii) For purposes of this paragraph, any amount received in payment of medical expenses is excluded.(6) For any public school employe receiving salary or benefits pursuant to this section, the statutes of limitations 20250HB1919PN3483 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 specified in sections 306.1, 315, 413 and 434 of the "Workers' Compensation Act," shall not begin to run until the expiration of the receipt of salary and or benefits under this section.(b) Nothing in this section shall supersede or preempt any provision of:(1) a collective bargaining agreement between a public school and an employe organization; or(2) the rights of an employe organization under the Public Employe Relations Act.(C) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION, INCLUDING A DETERMINATION RELATED TO A PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYE'S ELIGIBILITY FOR INJURY LEAVE OR ANY RELATED PAY OR BENEFITS UNDER THIS SECTION, SHALL BE BINDING UPON THE ADJUDICATION OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYE'S ELIGIBILITY FOR WORKERS' COMPENSATION BENEFITS UNDER THE "WORKERS' COMPENSATION ACT."(c) (D) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agreement." A contract or agreement between a public school and an employe organization under the Public Employe Relations Act."Employe organization." Shall have the same meaning given in section 301(3) of the Public Employe Relations Act."Employment contract." A contract for services between a public school and one or more public school employes who are not members of a bargaining unit represented by an employe organization."Governing body." The board of school directors of a school district or the governing entity of any other public school."Injury inflicted by a student, or by a student's parent or 20250HB1919PN3483 - 4 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 guardian" or "student-related injury." Shall mean:(1) an injury caused by a student or a student's parent or guardian;(2) an injury that would not have occurred but for the actions of the student or student's parent or guardian; or(3) a disease or infection that naturally results from an injury caused under paragraph (1) or (2) or is aggravated, reactivated or accelerated by the injury."Public Employe Relations Act." The act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the "Public Employe Relations Act.""Public school." As follows:(1) a school district;(2) an area career and technical school;(3) an intermediate unit;(4) a charter school;(5) a regional charter school; or(6) a cyber charter school."Public school employe." An individual employed by a public school or employed by an independent contractor and assigned to work in a public school."System." The term shall have the same meaning given to it in 24 Pa.C.S. § 8102 (relating to definitions).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1919PN3483 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223